Utah statutes.
9-4-1407.    Program development by grantees.

Grantees of Community Services Block Grant funds shall develop specific programs and goals, consistent with the Community Services Block Grant Act, designed to provide the most effective solutions to the problems of poverty identified in their communities within the constraints of available funding, including projects related to:

(1)  employment;

(2)  education;

(3)  income management;

(4)  housing;

(5)  emergency assistance;

(6)  nutrition;

(7)  linkages and coordination with other programs;

(8)  health; and

(9)  self-sufficiency.

